Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-533
Offenses relating to fur-bearing animals; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful (1) to mutilate or destroy the house or den of any fur-bearing animal except where such house or den obstructs a public or private ditch or watercourse, (2) to cut down or into any tree containing the den or nest of any fur-bearing animal for the purpose of harvesting such animal, (3) to use spears or any like device in hunting any fur-bearing animal, or (4) to use explosives, chemicals, or smokers of any kind to drive any fur-bearing animal out of a hole, den, or house. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least fifty dollars.

Laws 1929, c. 112, V, § 11, p. 429;

C.S.1929, § 37-511;

Laws 1937, c. 89, § 13, p. 298;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-511;

R.S.1943, § 37-511;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 12;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-511;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 253.